CIK: 1180145
Company Name: CARDIOVASCULAR SYSTEMS INC
Form Type : 10-K
Filing Date: 2012-09-10
Accession Number: 0001193125-12-386811


Item 1 Business. Special Note Regarding Forward Looking Statements This report contains plans, intentions, objectives, estimates and expectations that constitute forward looking statements within the meaning of Section 27A of the Securities Act of 1933, as amended, and Section 21E of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended (the Exchange Act ), which are subject to the safe harbor created by those sections. Forward looking statements are based on our management beliefs and assumptions and on information currently available to our management. In some cases, you can identify forward looking statements by terms such as may, will, should, could, would, expect, plans, anticipates, believes, estimates, projects, predicts, potential and similar expressions intended to identify forward looking statements. Examples of these statements include, but are not limited to, any statements regarding our future financial performance, results of operations or sufficiency of capital resources to fund our operating requirements, and other statements that are other than statements of historical fact. Our actual results could differ materially from those discussed in these forward looking statements due to a number of factors, including the risks and uncertainties that are described more fully by us in , Item 1A and I, Item 7 of this report and in our other filings with the SEC. You should not place undue reliance on these forward looking statements, which apply only as of the date of this report. You should read this report completely and with the understanding that our actual future results may be materially different from what we expect. Except as required by law, we assume no obligation to update these forward looking statements publicly, or to update the reasons actual results could differ materially from those anticipated in these forward looking statements, even if new information becomes available in the future. Corporate Information We were incorporated as Replidyne, Inc. in Delaware in 2000. On February 25, 2009, Replidyne, Inc. completed its business combination with Cardiovascular Systems, Inc., a Minnesota corporation ( CSI MN ), in accordance with the terms of the Agreement and Plan of Merger and Reorganization, dated as of November 3, 2008, by and among Replidyne, Responder Merger Sub, Inc., a wholly owned subsidiary of Replidyne ( Merger Sub ), and CSI MN (the Merger Agreement ). Pursuant to the Merger Agreement, Merger Sub merged with and into CSI MN, with CSI MN continuing after the merger as the surviving corporation and a wholly owned subsidiary of Replidyne. At the effective time of the merger, Replidyne changed its name to Cardiovascular Systems, Inc. and CSI MN changed its name to CSI Minnesota, Inc. Following the merger of Merger Sub with CSI MN, CSI MN merged with and into CSI, with CSI continuing after the merger as the surviving corporation. Our principal executive office is located at 651 Campus Drive, St. Paul, Minnesota 55112 Our teleph1 number is (651) 259 1600, and our website is www.csi360.com. The information contained in or accessible through our website is not incorporated by reference into, and should not be considered part of, this Annual Report on Form 10 K. We have received federal registration in the U.S. Patent and Trademark Office, or USPTO, of certain marks, including Diamondback 360 , Predator 360 and Stealth 360 , CSI , a first CSI logo, a second CSI logo, Lumen Library , ViperWire , ViperWire Advance , Viperslide , ViperTrack , and ViperCaddy. We have applied for federal registration with the USPTO of certain marks, including CSI in Class 10, DIAMONDBACK in CL 5, CSI Logo in CL 10, CONQUER 360 in CL 10, and DIAMONDBACK in CL 10. All other trademarks, trade names and service marks appearing in this Form 10 K are the property of their respective owners. Business Overview We are a medical device company focused on developing and commercializing minimally invasive treatment solutions for vascular disease. Interventional endovascular treatment of peripheral artery disease, or PAD, is our initial area of focus. PAD is caused by the accumulation of plaque in peripheral arteries, most commonly occurring in the pelvis and legs. PAD is a progressive disease, and, if left untreated, can lead to limb amputation or death. 1 Table of Contents Our primary products, the Stealth 360 PAD System ( Stealth 360 ), Diamondback 360 PAD System ( Diamondback 360 ), and Diamondback Predator 360 PAD System ( Predator 360 ) are catheter based platforms capable of treating a broad range of plaque types in leg arteries both above and below the knee and address many of the limitations associated with existing treatment alternatives. We refer to the Stealth 360 , Diamondback 360 , and the Predator 360 collectively in this Annual Report on Form 10 K as the PAD Systems. In August 2007, the U.S. Food and Drug Administration, or FDA, granted us 510(k) clearance for the use of the Diamondback 360 as a therapy in patients with PAD. We commenced a limited commercial introduction of the Diamondback 360 in the United States in September 2007 and began a full commercial launch during the quarter ended March 31, 2008. We received 510(k) clearance of the Predator 360 in March 2009 and commenced commercial launch in April 2009. We received 510(k) clearance of the Stealth 360 in March 2011 and commenced a commercial launch that same month. The Stealth 360 contains additional ease of use and physician control features while incorporating the orbital mechanism of action, optimal shaft and crown configurations of the Diamondback 360 and Predator 360 . As of June 30, 2012, we estimate that the PAD Systems had been utilized in more than 70,000 procedures. We intend to expand into the interventional coronary market though we need to complete certain clinical trials and receive FDA approval to do so. In May 2011, we received approval from the FDA to complete enrollment of 429 patients in our ORBIT II clinical trial for a coronary application for the Diamondback 360 , which followed the FDA review of data from the first 50 cases in the ORBIT II trial. In July 2012, we received approval from the FDA to include the new electric coronary device (similar to Stealth 360 technology used in PAD and customized specifically for the coronary application), which improves ease of use. The FDA requires 100 enrollments with the new electric coronary device and will allow up to 50 additional patients in the trial, as needed, to achieve that enrollment level, bringing the maximum trial enrollment to 479. More than 350 patients are now enrolled in the trial. In addition to the PAD Systems, we have expanded our product portfolio through internal product development and establishment of business relationships with other medical device companies. We offer multiple accessory products designed to complement the use of the PAD Systems, and we have an exclusive distribution agreement with Asahi Intecc Co., Ltd. to market its peripheral guidewire line in the United States. Market Overview Peripheral Artery Disease PAD is a circulatory problem in which plaque deposits build up on the walls of the arteries, reducing blood flow to the limbs. The most common early symptoms of PAD are pain, cramping or fatigue in the leg or hip muscles while walking. Symptoms may progress to include numbness, tingling or weakness in the leg and, in severe cases, burning or aching pain in the leg, foot or toes while resting. As PAD progresses, additional signs and symptoms occur, including cooling or color changes in the skin of the legs or feet, and sores on the legs or feet that may not heal. If left untreated. Progressing PAD may lead to critical limb ischemia, a condition in which the amount of oxygenated blood being delivered to the limb is insufficient to keep the tissue alive. Critical limb ischemia often leads to large non healing ulcers, infections, gangrene and, eventually, limb amputation or death. According to a report by the U.S. Department of Health and Human Services in 2006, PAD affects approximately eight to 12 million people in the United States. According to 2007 statistics from the American Heart Association, PAD becomes more common with age and affects approximately 12% to 20% of the population over 65 years old. An aging population, coupled with increasing incidence of diabetes and obesity, is likely to increase the prevalence of PAD. In many older PAD patients, particularly those with diabetes, PAD is characterized by fibrotic (moderately hard) or calcified (extremely hard) plaque deposits that have not been successfully treated with traditional non invasive treatment techniques. PAD may involve arteries throughout the leg. Arteries above the knee are generally long, straight and relatively wide, while arteries below the knee are shorter and branch into arteries that are progressively smaller in diameter. Despite the severity of PAD, it remains relatively underdiagnosed. According to an article published in Podiatry Today in 2006, only approximately 25 million of the eight to 12 million people in the United States with PAD are diagnosed. Although we believe the rate of diagnosis of PAD is increasing, underdiagnosis 2 Table of Contents continues due to patients failing to display symptoms or physicians misinterpreting symptoms as normal aging. Recent emphasis on PAD education from medical associations, insurance companies and other groups, coupled with publications in medical journals, is increasing physician and patient awareness of PAD risk factors, symptoms and treatment options. The PARTNERS study, which was published in the Journal of the American Medical Association in 2001, advocated increased PAD screening by primary care physicians. Physicians treat a significant portion of the 25 million people in the United States who are diagnosed with PAD using medical management, which includes lifestyle changes, such as diet and exercise and drug treatment. For instance, within a reference group of more than 1,000 patients from the PARTNERS study, 54% of the patients with a prior diagnosis of PAD were receiving antiplatelet medication treatment. While medications, diet and exercise may improve blood flow, they do not treat the underlying obstruction and many patients have difficulty maintaining lifestyle changes. Additionally, many prescribed medications are contraindicated, or inadvisable, for patients with heart disease, which often exists in PAD patients. Coronary Artery Disease Based on data from the 2009 National Discharge Survey, approximately 1,133,000 percutaneous coronary interventions, or PCI, procedures occurred in the United States in 2009. Based on various studies, we believe that approximately 38% of PCI procedures involve moderate to severe levels of calcified coronary arteries and may benefit from the use of our device if approved for commercial use. In addition, approximately 415,000 coronary artery bypass graft surgeries were performed in the United States. These patients generally have higher rates of calcification and we believe they may benefit from the use of our device if approved for commercial use. Our Product Comp1nts of the PAD Systems The PAD Systems each use a single use, low profile catheter that travels over our proprietary ViperWire Advance Guide Wire and is powered by either a saline infusion pump (Stealth 360 ) or an external control unit (Diamondback 360 or Predator 360 ). Catheter. The catheter consists of a control handle, which allows precise movement of the crown and predictable crown location; a flexible drive shaft with a diamond grit coated offset crown, which tracks and orbits over the guidewire; and a sheath, which covers the drive shaft and permits delivery of saline or medications to the treatment area. ViperWire Advance Guidewire. The ViperWire Advance is the second generation of the ViperWire. The ViperWire Advance was designed to offer an improved ability to maneuver through tortuous, twisting blood vessels and cross challenging lesions. The PAD Systems travel over this wire to the lesion and operate on this wire. ViperSlide Lubricant. ViperSlide is an exclusive lubricant designed to optimize the smooth operation of the PAD Systems. On April 4, 2011, we entered into a five year supply agreement with Fresenius Kabi AB pursuant to which Fresenius manufactures and serves as a single source supplier of the ViperSlide lubricant through March 2016. Saline Infusion Pump. Used exclusively with the Stealth 360 , the saline infusion pump mounts directly to the intravenous pole and bathes the device shaft and crown and provides a power supply for the operation of the catheter. Control Unit. Used in conjunction with the Diamondback 360 and Predator 360 PAD Systems, the control unit incorporates a touch screen interface on an easily maneuverable pole. Using an external air supply, the control unit regulates air pressure to drive the turbine located in the catheter handle to speeds ranging up to 200,000 revolutions per minute. Saline, delivered by a pumping mechanism on the control unit, bathes the device shaft and crown. The constant flow of saline reduces the risk of heat generation. 3 Table of Contents Technology Overview Plaque Modification through Differential Sanding. The PAD Systems were designed to allow the devices to differentiate between soft compliant and harder diseased tissue in the artery. The diamond grit crown preferentially engages and sands the harder material, but is designed not to damage more compliant parts of the artery. Arterial lesions tend to be harder and stiffer than compliant, undiseased vessel tissue, and they often are fibrotic or calcified. The PAD Systems also treat soft plaque, which is still harder than a normal vessel wall. The mechanism of action is a function of the centrifugal force generated by the PAD Systems as they rotate. As the crown moves outward, the centrifugal force is offset by the counterforce exerted by the arterial wall. If the tissue is compliant, it should flex away, rather than generating an opposing force that would allow the PAD Systems to engage and sand the wall. Diseased tissue provides resistance and is able to generate an opposing force that allows the PAD Systems to engage and sand the plaque. The sanded plaque is broken down into particles generally smaller than circulating red blood cells that are washed away downstream with the patient natural blood flow. Testing performed in carbon blocks, animal and cadaver models showed >93% of particles were smaller than a red blood cell, and >99% of particles were smaller than the lumen of the capillaries (which provide the connection between the arterial and venous system). The small particle size minimizes the risk of vascular bed overload, or a saturation of the peripheral vessels with large particles, which may cause slow or reduced blood flow to the foot. The small size of the particles allows them to be managed by the body natural cleansing of the blood, whereby various types of white blood cells eliminate worn out cells and other debris in the bloodstream. Mechanism of Action . The systems operate on the principles of centrifugal force. As the speed of the crown rotation increases, it creates centrifugal force, which increases the crown orbit and presses the diamond grit coated offset crown against the lesion or plaque, removing a small amount of plaque with each orbit. The characteristics of the orbit and the resulting lumen size can be adjusted by modifying 3 variables Speed. An increase in speed creates a larger orbital circle, thus accommodating vessels with larger lumens. Our current Stealth 360 system allows the user to choose between 3 rotational speeds. Crown Characteristics. The crown can be designed with various weights (as determined by crown geometry and material density) and coated with diamond grit of various types. The crown is available in 2 configurations classic and solid. Physicians select crown sizes and configurations based on several case criteria, including reference vessel size, length and degree of stenosis, stenosis morphology, and anatomy tortuosity. Physicians often use the classic crown configuration in small, more tortuous vessels. The solid crown configuration is designed with a tapered, leading edge for frontal sanding, which can be used in tight calcified disease. The Stealth 360 device is available with a 150 millimeter and 200 millimeter classic crown, and 125 millimeter, 150 millimeter and 200 millimeter solid crown configuration. There is also a 125 millimeter micro solid crown available with the Stealth 360 device, which is designed to provide hybrid performance between the classic and solid configurations. For both configurations, the catheter length is 145 centimeters, which addresses procedural approach and target lesion locations both above and below the knee. The Diamondback 360 utilizes the classic crown and the Predator 360 utilizes the solid crown. Both systems are available in multiple sizes, including 125, 150, 175, and 200 millimeter. There is also a 225 millimeter Predator 360 device. The PAD Systems are versatile in that by adjusting 1 or more of the speeds in conjunction with crown selection, multiple lesions can be treated. Applications The PAD Systems can be used to treat plaque in multiple anatomic locations. Below the Knee and Behind the Knee Peripheral Artery Disease. Arteries below and behind the knee have small diameters and may be diffusely diseased, calcified or both, limiting the effectiveness of traditional 4 Table of Contents devices. Behind the knee lesions also present challenges if a stent is required because stents frequently fracture due to the forces exerted on the vessels when the knee bends or flexes. The PAD Systems are effective in both diffused and calcified vessels. This was demonstrated in the OASIS trial, where 94.5% of lesions treated with the Diamondback 360 were behind or below the knee. Above the Knee Peripheral Artery Disease. Arteries above the knee are longer, straighter and wider than below the knee vessels. Plaque in these arteries may also be diffuse, fibrotic and calcific. As a result, our products are often used to treat lesions above the knee. Potential Applications Coronary Artery Disease. We have developed a modified version of the Diamondback 360 to treat coronary arteries. We have conducted numerous bench studies, pre clinical animal studies, and our ORBIT I 50 patient human feasibility clinical study to evaluate the Diamondback 360 in coronary artery disease. A coronary application requires us to conduct a clinical trial and file a premarket application, or PMA, and obtain approval from the FDA. We participated in 3 pre investigational device exemption, or IDE, meetings with the FDA and completed the human feasibility portion of a coronary trial in the summer of 2008 in India, enrolling 50 patients. The FDA agreed to accept the data from the India trial to support an IDE submission. The FDA granted unconditional approval in April 2010 to begin the ORBIT II coronary study in the United States. In May 2011, we received approval from the FDA to complete enrollment of 429 patients in our ORBIT II clinical trial for a coronary application for the Diamondback 360 , which followed the FDA review of data from the first 50 cases in the ORBIT II trial. In July 2012 we received approval from the FDA to include the new electric coronary device (similar to Stealth 360 technology used in PAD and customized specifically for the coronary application), which improves ease of use. The FDA requires 100 enrollments with the new electric coronary device and will allow up to 50 additional patients in the trial, as needed, to achieve that enrollment level, bringing the maximum trial enrollment to 479. More than 350 patients are now enrolled in the trial. Our Solution The PAD Systems represent an innovative approach to the treatment of PAD that provides physicians and patients with a procedure that addresses many of the limitations of traditional treatment alternatives. The PAD Systems each use single use catheters that incorporate a flexible drive shaft with an offset diamond grit coated crown. Physicians position the crown at the site of an arterial plaque containing lesion and remove the plaque by spinning the crown to orbit and sand it away, creating a smooth lumen, or channel, in the vessel. The PAD Systems are designed to differentiate between hard plaque and soft, compliant arterial tissue, a concept that we refer to as differential sanding. Normal arteries are compliant and have the ability to expand and contract as needed to supply blood flow to the legs and feet. Arteries burdened with fibrotic and or calcified plaque due to PAD lose their compliance which makes other therapies such as angioplasty, stenting, surgical bypass and atherectomy problematic. The PAD Systems sand plaque into small particles and restore both blood flow and vessel compliance. The particles created by the PAD Systems are generally smaller than red blood cells and are carried away by the bloodstream. The small size of the particles avoids the need for plaque collection reservoirs. The PAD Systems can typically treat the diseased arteries with less than 2 minutes of sanding time, potentially reducing the overall procedure time. We believe the PAD Systems offer the following key benefits Strong Safety Profile Differential Sanding Reduces Risk of Adverse Events. The PAD Systems are designed to differentiate between hard plaque and soft compliant arterial tissue. Arteries are composed of 3 tissue layers. The diamond grit coated offset crown at the working end of the devices engages and removes plaque from the artery wall with minimal likelihood of penetrating or damaging the fragile, inner layer of the arterial wall because soft, compliant tissue flexes away from the crown. Furthermore, the PAD Systems have rarely penetrated the middle or outer layers of the artery wall. The Diamondback 360 perforation rate was 5 Table of Contents 16% during our pivotal OASIS trial. Analysis by an independent pathology laboratory of more than 434 consecutive cross sections of porcine arteries treated with the Diamondback 360 revealed there was minimal to no damage, on average, to the middle layer, which is typically associated with restenosis. In addition, the safety profile of the Diamondback 360 was found to be non inferior to that of angioplasty, which is a common interventional method. Eliminates Need for Distal Protection. The PAD Systems sand plaque away from artery walls in a manner that produces particles of such a small size generally smaller than red blood cells that they are carried away by the bloodstream. The small size of the particles avoids the need for plaque collection reservoirs on the catheter and reduces the need for ancillary distal protection devices, commonly used with directional cutting atherectomy, and also significantly reduces the risk that larger pieces of removed plaque will block blood flow downstream. Allows Continuous Blood Flow During Procedure. The PAD Systems allow for continuous blood flow during the procedure, except when used in chronic total occlusions. Other devices may restrict blood flow due to the size of the catheter required or the use of distal protection devices, which could result in complications such as excessive heat and tissue damage. Proven Efficacy Efficacy Demonstrated in a 124 Patient Clinical Trial. Our pivotal OASIS clinical trial was a prospective 20 center study that involved 124 patients with 201 lesions treated by the Diamondback 360 . Performance targets were established cooperatively with the FDA before the trial began. Despite 55% of the lesions consisting of calcified plaque the Diamondback 360 in the OASIS trial successfully met the FDA study endpoints. Because the Predator 360 and Stealth 360 mechanism of action is identical to that of the Diamondback 360 , no additional efficacy trials were required by the FDA for 510(k) clearance of either PAD System. Treats Difficult, Fibrotic and Calcified Lesions. The PAD Systems enable physicians to remove plaque from long, fibrotic, calcified or bifurcated lesions in peripheral arteries both above and below the knee. Orbital Motion Improves Lesion Compliance. The orbiting action of the PAD Systems removes the hard plaque in the artery by sanding. As the crown sands away the plaque, the lumen of the artery is opened and the vessel wall becomes more compliant. The orbital motion and speed of the crown increases, thus allowing for continuous removal of plaque as the opening of the lumen increases during the operation of the devices. Non orbiting rotational atherectomy catheters remove plaque by either abrading the lesion with a spinning, abrasive burr, or by shaving the lesion with sharp blades. The burr type device acts in a manner similar to a drill and only creates a lumen the same size or slightly smaller than the size of the burr. The shaving devices are not able to discriminate between lesion disease and healthy vessel tissue. Differential Sanding Creates Smooth Lumens. The differential sanding of the PAD Systems creates a smooth surface inside the lumen. We believe that the smooth lumens created by the devices increase the velocity of blood flow and decrease the resistance to blood flow, which may decrease the potential for restenosis, or renarrowing of the arteries. Ease of Use Utilizes Familiar Techniques. Physicians using the PAD Systems employ techniques similar to those used in angioplasty, which are familiar to interventional cardiologists, vascular surgeons and interventional radiologists who are trained in endovascular techniques. The devices simple user interfaces require minimal additional training. Single Insertion to Complete Treatment. The orbital technology and differential sanding process of the PAD Systems allows for a single insertion to treat lesions, in most cases. Because the particles of plaque sanded away are of such small sizes, the PAD Systems do not require a collection reservoir that needs to be repeatedly emptied or cleaned during the procedure. Rather, the PAD Systems allow for multiple passes of the device over the lesion until plaque is removed and a smooth lumen is created. 6 Table of Contents Treatment Area Treats Entire Leg. The PAD Systems have the ability to treat the entire leg, including small vessels below the knee. Cost and Time Efficient Procedure Short Procedure Time. The PAD Systems have a short treatment time, typically less than 2 minutes. Single Crown Can Create Various Lumen Sizes Limiting Hospital Inventory Costs. The orbital mechanism of action with the PAD Systems allows 1 device to create various diameter lumens inside the artery. Adjusting the rotational speed of the crown changes the orbit to create the desired lumen diameter, thereby potentially avoiding the need to use multiple catheters of different sizes to treat multiple lesions. Single Insertion Reduces Procedural Time. Since the physician does not need to insert and remove multiple catheters or clean a plaque collection reservoir to complete the procedure, there is a potential for decreased procedure time. Our Strategy Our goal is to be the leading provider of minimally invasive solutions for the treatment of vascular disease. The key elements of our strategy include Drive Adoption Through Our Direct Sales Organization and Key Physician Leaders. We expect to continue to drive adoption of the PAD Systems through our direct sales force, which targets interventional cardiologists, vascular surgeons and interventional radiologists. As a key element of our strategy, we focus on educating and training physicians on the PAD Systems through our direct sales force and during seminars where physician industry leaders discuss case studies and treatment techniques using the devices. Collect Additional Clinical Evidence on Benefits of the PAD Systems. Physicians are increasingly requesting clinical study evidence to allow them to make the best treatment decisions to achieve the best possible short term and long term outcomes for their patients. We are focused on collecting and using clinical evidence to demonstrate the advantages of the PAD Systems and drive physician acceptance. Expand Product Portfolio within the Market for Treatment of Peripheral Arteries. In addition to the PAD Systems, we have expanded our product portfolio. We offer multiple accessory devices designed to complement the use of the PAD Systems. We continue to market the following products ViperSlide Lubricant an exclusive lubricant designed to optimize the smooth operation of the PAD Systems ViperTrack Radiopaque Tape a radiopaque tape to assist in measuring lesion lengths and marking lesion locations ViperWire Advance guidewire offering improved ability to maneuver through tortuous, twisting blood vessels and cross challenging lesions We are continuing to evaluate internal product development to further expand our portfolio of PAD treatment solutions. Evaluate Technology Platform for Coronary Market Use. We are evaluating our orbital technology to expand into the interventional coronary market. A coronary application would address a large market opportunity, further leveraging our core technology and expanding its market potential. In 2008, we completed the ORBIT I trial, a 50 patient study in India that investigated the safety of the Diamondback 360 device in treating calcified coronary artery lesions. Results successfully met both safety and efficacy endpoints. An IDE application has been approved by the FDA for ORBIT II, a pivotal trial that will enroll up to 479 patients in the United States to evaluate the safety and effectiveness of the PAD Systems in treating severely calcified coronary lesions. 7 Table of Contents Pursue Strategic Acquisitions and Partnerships. In August 2009, we signed an exclusive distribution agreement with Asahi to market 2 peripheral guidewire lines in the United States. In August 2011, we signed an amendment to expand the agreement to include 3 additional peripheral guidewires. The product portfolio now includes the Treasure Floppy and Regalia; and 3 specialty wires Astato 20, Astao 30, Treasure 12 In addition to adding to our product portfolio through internal development efforts, we intend to continue to explore the acquisition of other product lines, technologies or companies that may leverage our sales force or complement our strategic objectives. We plan to continue to evaluate distribution agreements, licensing transactions, other strategic partnerships, and the financial viability of marketing the PAD Systems internationally. Clinical Trials and Studies for Our Products We are committed to providing relevant clinical evidence to allow physicians to select and utilize the best treatment options for their patients. We have conducted 13 clinical trials to demonstrate the safety and efficacy of the PAD Systems in treating peripheral vascular disease, enrolling a total of 3,767 patients in our PAD I and PAD II pilot trials, OASIS pivotal trial, OASIS LT, CONFIRM DIAMONDBACK, CONFIRM PREDATOR CONFIRM OUTFLOW Post Market Registries and the CALCIUM 360 and COMPLIANCE 360 post market, randomized feasibility studies. The results of these studies consistently demonstrate that the PAD Systems provide predictable, repeatable and durable results that further differentiate themselves from other PAD treatments. Coronary artery disease, or CAD, continues to be a widespread and growing problem worldwide. Performing PCI on calcified lesions can lead to major adverse cardiac event, or MACE, rates as high as 24% at 30 days, stent malapposition and a number of procedural complications. To demonstrate the safety and effectiveness of orbital atherectomy for use in calcified coronary arteries, the ORBIT I coronary clinical trial was completed in India in 2009. In 2010, we began the ORBIT II pivotal study in the United States, evaluating the use of the Diamondback 360 in coronary arteries. The ORBIT II trial is the first trial in the United States designed specifically for difficult to treat calcified coronary artery disease. 8 Table of Contents Metrics Used in PAD Trials The common metrics used to evaluate plaque modification and removal devices for PAD include Metric Description Change in Compliance Compliance change as defined in the COMPLIANCE 360 protocol is to achieve 30% residual stenosis with orbital atherectomy followed by a low pressure balloon inflation of 4 atmospheres pressure (atm). Absolute Plaque Reduction Absolute plaque reduction is the difference between the pre treatment percent stenosis, or the narrowing of the vessel and the post treatment percent stenosis as measured angiographically. Target Lesion Revascularization Target lesion revascularization rate, or TLR rate, is the percentage of patients who have underg1 another peripheral intervention in the same lesion as treated during index procedure due to their worsening symptoms. Treatments such as an angioplasty, stenting, surgery or atherectomy may be used to reopen the treated lesion site. Ankle Brachial Index The Ankle Brachial Index, or ABI, is a measurement that is useful to evaluate the adequacy of circulation in the legs and improvement or worsening of leg circulation over time. The ABI is a ratio between the blood pressure in a patient ankle and a patient arm, with a ratio above 0.9 being normal. The common metrics used to evaluate atherectomy devices for PAD include Metric Description Serious Adverse Events SAEs include any experience that is fatal or life threatening, is permanently disabling, requires or prolongs hospitalization, or requires intervention to prevent permanent impairment or damage. SAEs may or may not be related to the device. Perforations Perforations occur when the artery is punctured during atherectomy treatment. Perforations may be non serious or serious (referred to as an SAE) depending on the treatment required to repair the perforation. PAD Feasibility Trials The first clinical trial was a 2 site, 17 patient feasibility clinical trial in Europe, referred to as PAD I, which began in March 2005. Patients enrolled in the trial had lesions that were less than 10 cm in length in arteries between 15 mm and 6.0 mm in diameter, with Rutherford Class scores of IV or lower. Patients were 9 Table of Contents evaluated at the time of the procedure and at 30 days following treatment. The purpose of PAD I was to obtain the first human clinical experience and evaluate the safety of the Diamondback 360 . This was determined by estimating the cumulative incidence of patients experiencing 1 or more SAEs within 30 days post treatment. The results of PAD I confirmed that the Diamondback 360 was safe and established that the Diamondback 360 could be used to treat vessels in the range of 15 mm to 4.0 mm, which are found primarily below the knee. PAD I also showed that removal of plaque could be accomplished and the resulting device to lumen ratio was approximately 10 to 20. The SAE rate in PAD I was 6% (1 of 17 patients). After being granted the CE Mark in May 2005, a 66 patient European clinical trial, PAD II, was initiated at seven sites, in August 2005. All patients had stenosis in vessels below the femoral artery of between 15 mm and 4.0 mm in diameter, with at least 50% blockage. The primary objectives of this study were to evaluate the acute (30 days or less) risk of experiencing an SAE post procedure and provide evidence of device effectiveness. Effectiveness was confirmed angiographically and based on the percentage of absolute plaque reduction. The PAD II results demonstrated safe and effective debulking in vessels with diameters ranging from 15 mm to 4.0 mm with a mean absolute plaque reduction of 55%. The SAE rate in PAD II was 9% (six of 66 patients), which did not differ significantly from existing non invasive treatment options. OASIS Pivotal Trial An IDE was approved in September 2005 to begin our pivotal United States trial, OASIS. OASIS was a 124 patient, 20 center, prospective trial that began enrollment in January 2006. Patients included in the trial had an ABI of less than 0.9, a Rutherford Class score of class V or lower and treated arteries of between 15 mm and 4.0 mm or less in diameter via angiogram measurement, with a well defined lesion of at least 50% diameter stenosis and lesions of no greater than 10.0 cm in length. The primary efficacy study endpoint was absolute plaque reduction of the target lesions from baseline to immediately post procedure. The primary safety endpoint was the cumulative incidence of SAEs at 30 days. In the OASIS trial, 94.5% of lesions treated were behind or below the knee, an area where lesions have traditionally g1 untreated until they require bypass surgery or amputation. Of the lesions treated in OASIS, 55% were comprised of calcified plaque, which presents a challenge to proper expansion and apposition of balloons and stents, and 48% were diffuse, or greater than 3 cm in length, which typically requires multiple balloon expansions or stent placements. Competing plaque removal devices are often ineffective with these difficult to treat lesions. The average time of treatment in the OASIS trial was 3 minutes per lesion, which compares favorably to the treatment time required by other plaque removal devices. The following table is a summary of the OASIS trial results Item Item FDA Target OASIS Result Absolute Plaque Reduction 55% 59.4% SAEs at 30 days 8%, with an upper bound of 16% 4.8%, device related; 9.7%, overall TLR 20% or less 24% Mean Standard Deviation In August 2007, the U.S. Food and Drug Administration, or FDA, granted us 510(k) clearance for the use of the Diamondback 360 as a therapy in patients with PAD. CLEAR 360 Study We conducted the CLEAR 360 study to evaluate the incidence of clinically significant hemolysis associated with orbital atherectomy used to treat severe peripheral arterial disease. This study enrolled 31 patients at four U.S. medical centers and was completed in 2009. This trial concluded that there was no clinically significant hemolysis after orbital atherectomy. 10 Table of Contents Post Market Feasibility Studies In May 2010, enrollment was completed in the COMPLIANCE 360 clinical trial. This post market prospective, randomized, multi center study evaluated the clinical and economic benefits of modifying plaque to change large vessel compliance above the knee with the Diamondback 360 or Predator 360 . The study compared the performance of the Diamondback 360 or Predator 360 , plus low pressure balloon angioplasty, if desired, with that of high pressure balloon inflation al1 Fifty patients were enrolled at nine U.S. medical centers with six and 12 month follow up periods. The study proved that compared to balloon angioplasty al1, the Diamondback 360 or Predator 360 plus low pressure balloon angioplasty leads to better luminal gain by improving lesion compliance and decreases the need for adjunctive stenting for the treatment of calcified femoral popliteal disease. Restenosis and TLR were similar at 12 months despite the large disparity of stent usage between the 2 groups. The results of this trial demonstrated that the Diamondback 360 or Predator 360 can achieve results in calcified plaque by improving lesion compliance through differential sanding, without the need for stent placement. In April 2010, enrollment was completed in the CALCIUM 360 o study, a prospective, randomized, multi center study comparing the effectiveness of the Diamondback 360 or Predator 360 to balloon angioplasty in treating calcified lesions below the knee. Calcified plaque exists in about 75 percent of lesions below the knee. Fifty patients were enrolled at eight U.S. medical centers. Procedural success was 931% (27 out of 29 lesions) for Diamondback 360 or Predator 360 plus balloon angioplasty and 824% (28 out of 34 lesions) for balloon angioplasty al1 Bail out stenting was seen in 2 out of 29 (6.9%) of Diamondback 360 or Predator 360 and five out of 35 (14.3%) of balloon angioplasty treated lesions. At 1 year follow up there were no amputations in either group. Freedom from target vessel revascularization and death was seen in 933% and 100% in the Diamondback 360 or Predator 360 and 80.0% and 68.4% of the balloon angioplasty group, respectively. Six and 12 month results showed the Diamondback 360 or Predator 360 treatment outperformed balloon angioplasty. A key finding was that by modifying calcified lesions first, the Diamondback 360 or Predator 360 allowed use of a lower pressure adjunctive balloon therapy, reducing the need for bail out stenting with improved longer term patient outcomes. CONFIRM Post Market Clinical Registry Series We completed enrollment in the CONFIRM Post Market Clinical Registry Series, that was designed to further evaluate acute parameters related to the use of the PAD Systems. The CONFIRM Series consisted of 3 registries CONFIRM I DIAMONDBACK, CONFIRM II PREDATOR, and CONFIRM III OUTFLOW. Enrollment of 733 patients in the CONFIRM I DIAMONDBACK Post Market Registry was completed in March 2010. In this prospective registry, 1,146 lesions were treated by 84 investigators at 57 medical centers with the Diamondback 360 . Patient characteristics were as follows 816% were smokers, 60.0% were diabetic, and 89.7% had hypertension. Lesions treated were above the knee (46.5%), behind the knee (17.5%) and below the knee (36.0%). Long and calcified lesions were treated with the Diamondback 360 followed by low pressure balloon angioplasty, if desired. An average residual stenosis of 120% was achieved following treatment, which is consistent with that achieved in PAD I, PAD II, and OASIS. Bail out stenting, or stenting required due to tears in the vessel wall, occurred in 4.6% of lesions. This is lower than the 35% to 40% bail out stent rate reported in the literature for patients treated with high pressure balloon angioplasty al1 in this type of challenging patient population. Results of this study were presented at the Complex Cardiovascular Catheter Therapeutic, or C3, conference in Orlando, FL in June 2012 Enrollment of 1,127 patients by 153 investigators at 122 institutions in the prospective CONFIRM II PREDATOR Post Market Registry was completed December 2010. Data on acute clinical performance and short term economic parameters were collected during this study. In this prospective registry, average patient age was 70.7 years; 615% were male and 90% had lesion with mild to severe calcium. The average lesion length was 72 mm. Predator 360 was used followed by balloon angioplasty (mean 5.44 atms) in 86% of lesions. Procedural events included minor and major dissection (123%), perforation (0.4%), slow flow (38%), abrupt closure (14%), distal macro embolization (19%) and bail out stenting due to dissection (6.3%). Average stenosis was 87.8% pre procedure, 339% post orbital and 9.6% post adjunctive treatment. The CONFIRM II PREDATOR 11 Table of Contents study validates the use of the latest iteration of orbital technology in restoring flow by changing lesion compliance, thus allowing low pressure balloon angioplasty with limited complications and reduced need for bail out stenting. These results were presented at the San Francisco TCT conference in November 2011 Data from CONFIRM DIAMONDBACK and PREDATOR registries were used to design the CONFIRM III OUTFLOW registry. This was the third study in the CONFIRM series to further evaluate acute procedural outcomes and economic parameters associated with use of the Diamondback Orbital Atherectomy System. Enrollment of 1,275 patients in the CONFIRM III OUTFLOW Post Market Registry was completed June 2011 In this prospective registry 59% were male and the average patient age was 72 years. Lesions treated above the knee were 42%, behind the knee were 16%, below the knee were 41%, and unknown were 2%. Average lesion length was 69.6mm. Lesions were treated with the Diamondback 360 or Predator 360 followed by low pressure balloon angioplasty, if desired. Pre procedure stenosis was 87% and the average residual stenosis of 10% was achieved following orbital and adjunctive treatment. Dissections rate was 9.9%, bail out stenting occurred in 6.0% of lesions and a low perforation rate was 0.7%. The CONFIRM III OUTFLOW registry provides additional evidence of the consistent results obtained using Diamondback 360 or Predator 360 to treat difficult peripheral arterial disease. ORBIT I Coronary Feasibility Safety Study The ORBIT I feasibility study evaluated performance of the Diamondback 360 for the treatment of de novo calcified coronary lesions. The ORBIT I trial was completed in India in 2009 and enrolled 50 patients. The endpoints were measured by device performance and MACE rate and TLR at six months. Device performance success was 98%. The observed MACE rate at 30 day and at 6 months was 6% and 8% respectively. The 30 day and 6 month TLR was 2%. The ORBIT I trial demonstrates that the Diamondback system can be used to modify de novo calcified coronary lesions and facilitated stent delivery in this difficult to treat plaque morphology. ORBIT II Coronary IDE Study To market the Diamondback 360 in the United States for use in the coronary arteries, we are required to conduct further clinical trials and obtain premarket approval from the FDA. In May 2010, the FDA approved the IDE and we began the ORBIT II pivotal clinical trial. This trial plans to enroll up to 479 patients in up to 55 U.S. investigational centers to evaluate the safety and effectiveness of the PAD Systems in treating severely calcified coronary lesions. In May 2011, we received approval from the FDA to complete enrollment of 429 patients in our ORBIT II clinical trial for a coronary application for the Diamondback 360 , which followed the FDA review of data from the first 50 cases in the ORBIT II trial. In July 2012 we received approval from the FDA to include the new electric coronary device (similar to Stealth 360 technology used in PAD and customized specifically for the coronary application), which improves ease of use. The FDA requires 100 enrollments with the new electric coronary device and will allow up to 50 additional patients in the trial, as needed, to achieve that enrollment level, bringing the maximum trial enrollment to 479. More than 350 patients are now enrolled in the trial. Sales and Marketing We market and sell our products through a direct sales force in the United States. Revenues for the PAD Systems for fiscal 2012, fiscal 2011 and fiscal 2010 were $730 million, $69.3 million and $57.4 million, respectively. While we sell directly to hospitals and office based laboratories, we have targeted sales and marketing efforts to interventional cardiologists, vascular surgeons and interventional radiologists with experience using similar catheter based procedures, such as angioplasty, stenting, and cutting or laser atherectomy. Physician referral programs and peer to peer education are other key elements of our sales strategy. Patient referrals come from general practiti1rs, podiatrists, nephrologists and endocrinologists. We target our marketing efforts to practiti1rs through physician education, medical conferences, seminars, peer reviewed journals and marketing materials. Our sales and marketing program focuses on educating physicians regarding the proper use and application of the PAD Systems; clinical results showing safety and efficacy of products; 12 Table of Contents developing relationships with key opinion leaders; and facilitating regional referral marketing programs. We are not marketing our products internationally; however, we continue to evaluate international opportunities. We executed a Purchasing Agreement with HealthTrust Purchasing Group, L.P., or HPG, that became effective on July 15, 2011 HPG acts as a group purchasing organization for the healthcare providers belonging to HPG as participants. Under the Purchasing Agreement, all of HPG participants located in the United States or its territories are eligible to purchase the PAD Systems and related products at prices set forth in the Purchasing Agreement. HPG has agreed not to contract with more than 1 alternative supplier from which participants may purchase products comparable to ours under the agreement. During the term of the agreement, we have agreed to not solicit any HPG participant to enter into a separate agreement for our products. Research and Development Our research and development efforts are focused in the development of products to penetrate our 3 key target markets below and behind the knee, above the knee and coronary vessels. Research and development projects include the development of electric versions of the PAD Systems, shaft designs, crown designs, and PAD and coronary clinical trials. Research and development expenses for fiscal 2012, fiscal 2011 and fiscal 2010 were $114 million, $8.9 million and $10.3 million, respectively. Manufacturing We use internally manufactured and externally sourced comp1nts to manufacture the PAD Systems. Most of the externally sourced comp1nts are available from multiple suppliers; however, a few key comp1nts, including the diamond grit coated crown, micro motors, printed circuit board assemblies, and our ViperSlide Lubricant are single sourced. We have strategies and arrangements in place for procuring our key comp1nts from alternative suppliers in the event that 1 or more of our single source suppliers were to discontinue supplying us with a key comp1nt. We assemble the shaft, crown and handle comp1nts on site, and test, pack, seal and label the finished assembly before sending the packaged product to a contract sterilization facility. Upon return from the sterilizer, the product is held in inventory prior to shipping to our customers. Our manufacturing facility in Minnesota, including the shaft manufacturing and the controlled environment assembly areas, are equipped to accommodate approximately 30,000 devices per shift annually. It also has storage capacity for approximately 8,000 devices and 50 control units. As the control unit becomes obsolete, we will convert our storage space for use with the Stealth 360 PAD System. Our Pearland, Texas facility is 46,000 square feet and includes a custom built clean room and production space for future expansion of value add processes, including machining and electronics assembly. The facility, when it becomes fully staffed and equipped, will have the capacity to produce approximately 75,000 devices per shift annually. This facility has finished goods storage capacity for greater than 15,000 devices of the PAD Systems and other accessory products and over 500 Stealth 360 saline infusion pumps. We are registered with the FDA as a medical device manufacturer. We have opted to maintain quality assurance and quality management certifications to enable us to market our products in the member states of the European Union, the European Free Trade Association and countries that have entered into Mutual Recognition Agreements with the European Union. We are ISO 134852003 certified, and our renewal is due by December 2012 Since commercialization, we have had 3 minor instances of recall, involving a single lot of Diamondback 360 devices (8 units), 2 boxes of ViperWires (10 wires), and 70 lots of Stealth 360 devices (145 units), related to Use By date labeling issues. While these recalls were reported to the FDA, according to regulations, they did not present a risk to patient safety. A separate recall, initiated in 2009 and completed in 2010, involved the ViperSheath, which is owned and manufactured by Thomas Medical Products. As the distributor for the ViperSheath, we were required to recall all unused units from our customers and return them to 13 Table of Contents Thomas Medical Products. All of the unused ViperSheaths were captured and subsequently destroyed by Thomas Medical Products, with FDA observance. We also completed a recall in June 2012 involving six lots of Stealth 360 micro crown devices (45 units) due to the potential for an insufficient solder bond. All unused devices were returned and no patient injuries resulted from this recall. Third Party Reimbursement and Pricing Third party payors, including private insurers, and government insurance programs, such as Medicare and Medicaid, pay for a significant portion of patient care provided in the United States. The single largest payor in the United States is the Medicare program, a federal governmental health insurance program administered by the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services, or CMS. Medicare covers certain medical care expenses for eligible elderly and disabled individuals, including a large percentage of the population with PAD who could be treated with the PAD Systems. In addition, private insurers often follow the coverage and reimbursement policies of Medicare. Consequently, Medicare coverage and reimbursement policies are important to our operations. CMS has established Medicare reimbursement codes describing atherectomy products and procedures using atherectomy products. We believe that physicians and hospitals that treat PAD with the PAD Systems will generally be eligible to receive reimbursement from Medicare and private insurers for the cost of the single use catheter and the physician services. Competition The medical device industry is highly competitive, subject to rapid change and significantly affected by new product introductions and other activities of industry participants. The PAD Systems compete with a variety of other products or devices for the treatment of vascular disease, including stents, balloon angioplasty catheters and atherectomy catheters, as well as products used in vascular surgery. Large competitors in the stent and balloon angioplasty market segments include Abbott Laboratories, Boston Scientific, Cook Medical, Johnson & Johnson and Medtronic. We also compete against manufacturers of atherectomy catheters including, among others, Covidien, Spectranetics, Boston Scientific and MEDRAD, a business of Bayer HealthCare, as well as other manufacturers that may enter the market due to the increasing demand for treatment of vascular disease. Other competitors include pharmaceutical companies that manufacture drugs for the treatment of mild to moderate PAD and companies that provide products used by surgeons in peripheral bypass procedures. We are not aware of any competing catheter systems either currently on the market or in development that also use an orbital motion to create lumens larger than the catheter itself. Because of the size of the peripheral opportunities, competitors and potential competitors have historically dedicated significant resources to aggressively promote their products. We believe that the PAD Systems compete primarily on the basis of safety and efficacy; predictable clinical performance; ease of use; price; physician relationships; customer service and support; and adequate third party reimbursement. Patents and Intellectual Property We rely on a combination of patent, copyright and other intellectual property laws, trade secrets, nondisclosure agreements and other measures to protect our proprietary rights. As of July 31, 2012, we held 24 issued U.S. patents and have 28 U.S. patent applications pending, as well as 85 issued or granted foreign patents 14 Table of Contents and 123 foreign patent applications, each of which corresponds to aspects of our U.S. patents and applications. Our issued U.S. patents expire between 2012 and 2032, and our most important patent, U.S. Patent No. 6,494,890, is due to expire in 2017. Our issued patents and patent applications relate primarily to the design and operation of certain interventional atherectomy devices, including the PAD Systems. These patents and applications include claims covering key aspects of certain rotational atherectomy devices, including the design, manufacture and therapeutic use of certain atherectomy abrasive heads, drive shafts, control systems, handles and couplings. As we continue to research and develop our atherectomy technology, we intend to file additional U.S. and foreign patent applications related to the design, manufacture and therapeutic uses of atherectomy devices. In addition, we hold 12 registered U.S. trademarks, six registered marks in Europe, five registered marks in Canada, 1 registered mark in Mexico, and five U.S. trademark applications pending. We also rely on trade secrets, technical know how and continuing innovation to develop and maintain our competitive position. We seek to protect our proprietary information and other intellectual property by requiring our employees, consultants, contractors, outside scientific collaborators and other advisors to execute non disclosure and assignment of invention agreements on commencement of their employment or engagement. Agreements with our employees also forbid them from bringing the proprietary rights of third parties to us. We also require confidentiality or material transfer agreements from third parties that receive our confidential data or materials. Government Regulation of Medical Devices Governmental authorities in the United States at the federal, state and local levels and in other countries extensively regulate, among other things, the development, testing, manufacture, labeling, promotion, advertising, distribution, marketing and export and import of medical devices such as the PAD Systems. Failure to obtain approval to market our products under development and to meet the ongoing requirements of these regulatory authorities could prevent us from marketing and continuing to market our products. United States The Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act, or FDCA, and the FDA implementing regulations govern medical device design and development, preclinical and clinical testing, premarket clearance or approval, registration and listing, manufacturing, labeling, storage, advertising and promotion, sales and distribution, export and import, and post market surveillance. Medical devices and their manufacturers are also subject to inspection by the FDA. The FDCA, supplemented by other federal and state laws, also provides civil and criminal penalties for violations of its provisions. We manufacture and market medical devices that are regulated by the FDA, comparable state agencies and regulatory bodies in other countries. Unless an exemption applies, each medical device we wish to commercially distribute in the United States will require marketing authorization from the FDA prior to distribution. The 2 primary types of FDA marketing authorization are premarket notification (also called 510(k) clearance) and premarket approval (also called PMA approval). The type of marketing authorization applicable to a device 510(k) clearance or PMA approval is generally linked to classification of the device. The FDA classifies medical devices into 1 of 3 classes (Class I, II or III) based on the degree of risk FDA determines to be associated with a device and the extent of control deemed necessary to ensure the device safety and effectiveness. Devices requiring fewer controls because they are deemed to pose lower risk are placed in Class I or II. Class I devices are deemed to pose the least risk and are subject only to general controls applicable to all devices, such as requirements for device labeling, premarket notification, and adherence to the FDA current good manufacturing practice requirements, as reflected in its Quality System Regulation, or QSR. Class II devices are intermediate risk devices that are subject to general controls and may also be subject to special controls such as performance standards, product specific guidance documents, special labeling requirements, patient registries or postmarket surveillance. Class III devices are those for which insufficient information exists to assure safety and effectiveness solely through general or special controls, and include life sustaining, life supporting or implantable devices, and devices not substantially equivalent to a device that is already legally marketed. 15 Table of Contents Most Class I devices and some Class II devices are exempted by regulation from the 510(k) clearance requirement and can be marketed without prior authorization from FDA. Class I and Class II devices that have not been so exempted are eligible for marketing through the 510(k) clearance pathway. By contrast, devices placed in Class III generally require PMA approval prior to commercial marketing. The PMA approval process is generally more stringent, time consuming and expensive than the 510(k) clearance process. 510(k) Clearance. To obtain 510(k) clearance for a medical device, an applicant must submit a premarket notification to the FDA demonstrating that the device is substantially equivalent to a predicate device legally marketed in the United States. A device is substantially equivalent if, with respect to the predicate device, it has the same intended use and has either (i) the same technological characteristics or (ii) different technological characteristics and the information submitted demonstrates that the device is as safe and effective as a legally marketed device and does not raise different questions of safety or effectiveness. A showing of substantial equivalence sometimes, but not always, requires clinical data. Generally, the 510(k) clearance process can exceed 90 days and may extend to a year or more. After a device has received 510(k) clearance for a specific intended use, any modification that could significantly affect its safety or effectiveness, such as a significant change in the design, materials, method of manufacture or intended use, will require a new 510(k) clearance or PMA approval (if the device as modified is not substantially equivalent to a legally marketed predicate device). The determination as to whether new authorization is needed is initially left to the manufacturer; however, the FDA may review this determination to evaluate the regulatory status of the modified product at any time and may require the manufacturer to cease marketing and recall the modified device until 510(k) clearance or PMA approval is obtained. The manufacturer may also be subject to significant regulatory fines or penalties. We received 510(k) clearance for use of the Diamondback 360 as a therapy in patients with PAD in the United States on August 22, 2007. We received additional 510(k) clearances for the control unit used with the Diamondback 360 on October 25, 2007 and for the solid crown version of the Diamondback 360 on November 9, 2007. We were granted 510(k) clearance of the Predator 360 in March 2009 and Stealth 360 in March 2011 Premarket Approval. A PMA application requires the payment of significant user fees and must be supported by valid scientific evidence, which typically requires extensive data, including technical, preclinical, clinical and manufacturing data, to demonstrate to the FDA satisfaction the safety and efficacy of the device. A PMA application must also include a complete description of the device and its comp1nts, a detailed description of the methods, facilities and controls used to manufacture the device, and proposed labeling. After a PMA application is submitted and found to be sufficiently complete, the FDA begins an in depth review of the submitted information. During this review period, the FDA may request additional information or clarification of information already provided. Also during the review period, an advisory panel of experts from outside the FDA may be convened to review and evaluate the application and provide recommendations to the FDA as to the approvability of the device. In addition, the FDA will conduct a pre approval inspection of the manufacturing facility to ensure compliance with the FDA Quality System Regulations, or QSR, which requires manufacturers to follow design, testing, control, documentation and other quality assurance procedures. FDA review of a PMA application is required by statute to take no longer than 180 days, although the process typically takes significantly longer, and may require several years to complete. The FDA can delay, limit or deny approval of a PMA application for many reasons, including the systems may not be safe or effective to the FDA satisfaction; the data from preclinical studies and clinical trials may be insufficient to support approval; the manufacturing process or facilities used may not meet applicable requirements; and changes in FDA approval policies or adoption of new regulations may require additional data. If the FDA evaluations of both the PMA application and the manufacturing facilities are favorable, the FDA will either issue an approval letter or an approvable letter, which usually contains a number of conditions that must be met in order to secure final approval of the PMA. When and if those conditions have been fulfilled to the 16 Table of Contents satisfaction of the FDA, the agency will issue a PMA approval letter authorizing commercial marketing of the device for certain indications. If the FDA evaluation of the PMA or manufacturing facilities is not favorable, the FDA will deny approval of the PMA or issue a not approvable letter. The FDA may also determine that additional clinical trials are necessary, in which case the PMA approval may be delayed for several months or years while the trials are conducted and then the data submitted in an amendment to the PMA. Even if a PMA application is approved, the FDA may approve the device with an indication that is narrower or more limited than originally sought. The agency can also impose restrictions on the sale, distribution or use of the device as a condition of approval, or impose post approval requirements such as continuing evaluation and periodic reporting on the safety, efficacy and reliability of the device for its intended use. New PMA applications or PMA supplements may be required for modifications to the manufacturing process, labeling, device specifications, materials or design of a device that is approved through the PMA process. PMA approval supplements often require submission of the same type of information as an initial PMA application, except that the supplement is limited to information needed to support any changes from the device covered by the original PMA application and may not require as extensive clinical data or the convening of an advisory panel. We are currently enrolling patients in an FDA approved IDE trial to support a PMA to use the Diamondback 360 as a therapy in treating patients with calcified coronary artery disease. The FDA granted unconditional approval in April 2010 to begin the ORBIT II coronary trial in the United States. This pivotal trial is set up in 2 phases; Phase I allowed us to enroll up to 100 patients at as many as 50 U.S. sites, Phase II allows us to expand the trial to the full complement of 429 patients. In May 2011, we received approval from the FDA to complete enrollment of 429 patients in our ORBIT II clinical trial for a coronary application for the Diamondback 360 , which followed the FDA review of data from the first 50 cases in the ORBIT II trial. In July 2012 we received approval from the FDA to include the new electric coronary device (similar to Stealth 360 technology used in PAD and customized specifically for the coronary application), which improves ease of use. The FDA requires 100 enrollments with the new electric coronary device and will allow up to 50 additional patients in the trial, as needed, to achieve that enrollment level, bringing the maximum trial enrollment to 479. More than 350 patients are now enrolled in the trial Clinical Trials. Clinical trials are almost always required to support a PMA application and are sometimes required for a 510(k) clearance. These trials generally require submission of an application for an IDE to the FDA. The IDE application must be supported by appropriate data, such as animal and laboratory testing results, showing that it is safe to test the device in humans and that the testing protocol is scientifically sound. The IDE application must be approved in advance by the FDA for a specified number of patients, unless the product is deemed a non significant risk device and eligible for more abbreviated IDE requirements. Generally, clinical trials for a significant risk device may begin once the IDE application is approved by the FDA and the study protocol and informed consent are approved by appropriate institutional review boards at the clinical trial sites. FDA approval of an IDE allows clinical testing to go forward but does not bind the FDA to accept the results of the trial as sufficient to prove the product safety and efficacy, even if the trial meets its intended success criteria. With certain exceptions, changes made to an investigational plan after an IDE is approved must be submitted in an IDE supplement and approved by FDA (and by governing institutional review boards when appropriate) prior to implementation. All clinical trials must be conducted in accordance with regulations and requirements collectively known as good clinical practice. Good clinical practices include the FDA IDE regulations, which describe the conduct of clinical trials with medical devices, including the recordkeeping, reporting and monitoring responsibilities of sponsors and investigators, and labeling of investigation devices. They also prohibit promotion, test marketing or commercialization of an investigational device and any representation that such a device is safe or effective for the purposes being investigated. Good clinical practices also include the FDA regulations for institutional review board approval and for protection of human subjects (such as informed consent), as well as disclosure of financial interests by clinical investigators. Required records and reports are subject to inspection by the FDA. The results of clinical testing may be unfavorable or, even if the intended safety and efficacy success criteria are achieved, may not be considered 17 Table of Contents sufficient for the FDA to grant approval or clearance of a product. The commencement or completion of any clinical trials may be delayed or halted, or be inadequate to support approval of a PMA application or clearance of a premarket notification for numerous reasons, including, but not limited to, the following the FDA or other regulatory authorities do not approve a clinical trial protocol or a clinical trial (or a change to a previously approved protocol or trial that requires approval), or place a clinical trial on hold; patients do not enroll in clinical trials or follow up at the rate expected; patients do not comply with trial protocols or experience greater than expected adverse side effects; institutional review boards and third party clinical investigators may delay or reject the trial protocol or changes to the trial protocol; third party clinical investigators decline to participate in a trial or do not perform a trial on the anticipated schedule or consistent with the clinical trial protocol, investigator agreements, good clinical practices or other FDA requirements; third party organizations do not perform data collection and analysis in a timely or accurate manner; regulatory inspections of the clinical trials or manufacturing facilities, which may, among other things, require corrective action or suspension or termination of the clinical trials; changes in governmental regulations or administrative actions; the interim or final results of the clinical trial are inconclusive or unfavorable as to safety or efficacy; and the FDA concludes that the trial design is inadequate to demonstrate safety and efficacy. Continuing Regulation. After a device is approved and placed in commercial distribution, numerous regulatory requirements continue to apply. These include establishment registration and device listing upon the commencement of manufacturing; the QSR, which requires manufacturers, including third party manufacturers, to follow design, testing, control, documentation and other quality assurance procedures during medical device design and manufacturing processes; labeling regulations, which prohibit the promotion of products for unapproved or off label uses and impose other restrictions on labeling and promotional activities; medical device reporting regulations, which require that manufacturers report to the FDA if a device may have caused or contributed to a death or serious injury or malfuncti1d in a way that would likely cause or contribute to a death or serious injury if malfunctions were to recur; corrections and removal reporting regulations, which require that manufacturers report to the FDA field corrections; and product recalls or removals if undertaken to reduce a risk to health posed by the device or to remedy a violation of the FDCA caused by the device that may present a risk to health. In addition, the FDA may require a company to conduct postmarket surveillance studies or order it to establish and maintain a system for tracking its products through the chain of distribution to the patient level. Failure to comply with applicable regulatory requirements, including those applicable to the conduct of clinical trials, can result in enforcement action by the FDA, which may lead to any of the following sanctions warning letters or untitled letters; fines, injunctions and civil penalties; product recall or seizure; unanticipated expenditures; delays in clearing or approving or refusal to clear or approve products; 18 Table of Contents withdrawal or suspension of FDA approval; orders for physician notification or device repair, replacement or refund; operating restrictions, partial suspension or total shutdown of production or clinical trials; and criminal prosecution. We and our contract manufacturers, specification developers and suppliers are also required to manufacture our products in compliance with current Good Manufacturing Practice, or GMP, requirements set forth in the QSR. The QSR requires a quality system for the design, manufacture, packaging, labeling, storage, installation and servicing of marketed devices, and includes extensive requirements with respect to quality management and organization, device design, buildings, equipment, purchase and handling of comp1nts, production and process controls, packaging and labeling controls, device evaluation, distribution, installation, complaint handling, servicing and record keeping. The FDA enforces the QSR through periodic announced and unannounced inspections that may include the manufacturing facilities of subcontractors. If the FDA believes that we or any of our contract manufacturers or regulated suppliers is not in compliance with these requirements, it can shut down our manufacturing operations, require recall of our products, refuse to clear or approve new marketing applications, institute legal proceedings to detain or seize products, enjoin future violations or assess civil and criminal penalties against us or our officers or other employees. Any such action by the FDA would have a material adverse effect on our business. Fraud and Abuse Our operations will be directly, or indirectly through our customers, subject to various state and federal fraud and abuse laws, including, without limitation, the FDCA, federal Anti Kickback Statute and False Claims Act. These laws may impact, among other things, our proposed sales, marketing, and education programs. In addition, these laws require us to screen individuals and other companies, suppliers and vendors in order to ensure that they are not debarred by the federal government and therefore prohibited from doing business in the healthcare industry. The federal Anti Kickback Statute prohibits persons from knowingly and willfully soliciting, offering, receiving or providing remuneration, directly or indirectly, in exchange for or to induce either the referral of an individual, or the furnishing or arranging for a good or service, for which payment may be made under a federal healthcare program such as the Medicare and Medicaid programs. Several courts have interpreted the statute intent requirement to mean that if any 1 purpose of an arrangement involving remuneration is to induce referrals of federal healthcare covered business, the statute has been violated. The Anti Kickback Statute is broad and prohibits many arrangements and practices that are lawful in businesses outside of the healthcare industry. Many states have also adopted laws similar to the federal Anti Kickback Statute, some of which apply to the referral of patients for healthcare Item or services reimbursed by any source, not only the Medicare and Medicaid programs. The federal False Claims Act prohibits persons from knowingly filing or causing to be filed a false claim to, or the knowing use of false statements to obtain payment from, the federal government. Various states have also enacted laws modeled after the federal False Claims Act. In addition to the laws described above, the Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996 created 2 new federal crimes healthcare fraud and false statements relating to healthcare matters. The healthcare fraud statute prohibits knowingly and willfully executing a scheme to defraud any healthcare benefit program, including private payors. The false statements statute prohibits knowingly and willfully falsifying, concealing or covering up a material fact or making any materially false, fictitious or fraudulent statement in connection with the delivery of or payment for healthcare benefits, Item or services. Voluntary industry codes, federal guidance documents and a variety of state laws address the tracking and reporting of marketing practices relative to gifts given and other expenditures made to doctors and other healthcare professionals. In addition to impacting our marketing and educational programs, internal business processes will be affected by the numerous legal requirements and regulatory guidance at the state, federal and industry levels. 19 Table of Contents International Regulation International sales of medical devices are subject to foreign government regulations, which may vary substantially from country to country. The time required to obtain approval in a foreign country may be longer or shorter than that required for FDA approval and the requirements may differ. For example, the primary regulatory environment in Europe with respect to medical devices is that of the European Union, which includes most of the major countries in Europe. Other countries, such as Switzerland, have voluntarily adopted laws and regulations that mirror those of the European Union with respect to medical devices. The European Union has adopted numerous directives and standards regulating the design, manufacture, clinical trials, labeling and adverse event reporting for medical devices. Devices that comply with the requirements of a relevant directive will be entitled to bear the CE conformity marking, indicating that the device conforms to the essential requirements of the applicable directives and, accordingly, can be commercially distributed throughout the European Union, although actual implementation of these directives may vary on a country by country basis. The method of assessing conformity varies depending on the class of the product, but normally involves a combination of submission of a design dossier, self assessment by the manufacturer, a third party assessment and, review of the design dossier by a Notified Body. This third party assessment generally consists of an audit of the manufacturer quality system and manufacturing site, as well as review of the technical documentation used to support application of the CE Mark to 1 product and possibly specific testing of the manufacturer product. An assessment by a Notified Body of 1 country within the European Union is required in order for a manufacturer to commercially distribute the product throughout the European Union. We obtained CE marking approval for sale of the Diamondback 360 in May 2005. Environmental Regulation Our operations are subject to regulatory requirements relating to the environment, waste management and health and safety matters, including measures relating to the release, use, storage, treatment, transportation, discharge, disposal and remediation of hazardous substances. We are currently classified and licensed as a Very Small Quantity Hazardous Waste Generator within Ramsey County, Minnesota. There are no regulated wastes requiring licensing in our Texas facility. Employees As of June 30, 2012, we had 290 employees, including 69 employees in manufacturing, 162 employees in sales, 10 employees in marketing, 13 employees in clinical, 21 employees in general and administrative, and 15 employees in research and development, all of which are full time employees. N1 of our employees are represented by a labor union or are parties to a collective bargaining agreement, and we believe that our employee relations are good. Item 1A. Risk Factors . Risks Relating to Our Business and Operations We have a history of net losses and a short commercialization experience, and we are likely to continue to incur losses. We are not profitable and have incurred net losses in each fiscal year since our formation in 1989. In particular, we had net losses of $16.8 million in fiscal 2012, $111 million in fiscal 2011, and $239 million in fiscal 2010. As of June 30, 2012, we had an accumulated deficit of approximately $179.2 million. We commenced commercial sales of the Diamondback 360 in September 2007, and our short commercialization experience makes it difficult for us to predict future performance. We also expect to incur significant additional expenses for sales and marketing and manufacturing as we continue to commercialize the PAD Systems and additional expenses as we seek to develop and commercialize future versions of the PAD Systems, a coronary application for our technology, and other products. Additionally, we expect that our general and administrative expenses will increase as our business grows. As a result, our operating losses are likely to continue. 20 Table of Contents We may be unable to sustain our revenue growth. Our revenue has grown in each of the fiscal years since we commenced commercial sales of the Diamondback 360 in September 2007. Our ability to continue to increase our revenues in future periods will depend on our ability to increase sales of the PAD Systems and new and improved products we introduce, including growing our customer base and reorders of the PAD Systems from those customers, and obtaining new applications for our technology. We may not be able to generate, sustain or increase revenues on a quarterly or annual basis. If we cannot achieve or sustain revenue growth for an extended period, our financial results will be adversely affected and our stock price may decline. Economic conditions may adversely affect our business. Adverse worldwide economic conditions may have adverse implications on our business. A significant change in the liquidity or financial condition of our customers could cause unfavorable trends in our receivable collections and additional allowances may be required, which could adversely affect our operating results. Adverse worldwide economic conditions may also adversely impact our suppliers ability to provide us with materials and comp1nts, which could adversely affect our business and operating results. The PAD Systems and future products may never achieve broad market acceptance. The PAD Systems and future products we may develop may never gain broad market acceptance among physicians, patients and the medical community. The degree of market acceptance of any of our products will depend on a number of factors, including the actual and perceived effectiveness and reliability of our products; the prevalence and severity of any adverse patient events involving our products; the results of any clinical trials relating to use of our products; the availability, relative cost and perceived advantages and disadvantages of alternative technologies or treatment methods for conditions treated by our products; the degree to which treatments using our products are approved for reimbursement by public and private insurers; the degree to which physicians adopt the PAD Systems; the extent to which we are successful in educating physicians about PAD in general and the existence of the PAD Systems in particular; the strength of our marketing and distribution infrastructure; and the level of education and awareness among physicians and hospitals concerning our products. Failure of the PAD Systems to significantly penetrate current or new markets would negatively impact our business, financial condition and results of operations. Our customers may not be able to achieve adequate reimbursement for using the PAD Systems, which could affect the acceptance of our products and cause our business to suffer. The availability of insurance coverage and reimbursement for newly approved medical devices and procedures is uncertain. The commercial success of our products is substantially dependent on whether third party insurance coverage and reimbursement for the use of such products and related services are available. We expect the PAD Systems to generally be purchased by hospitals and other providers who will then seek reimbursement from various public and private third party payors, such as Medicare, Medicaid and private insurers, for the services provided to patients. We can give no assurance that these third party payors will provide adequate reimbursement for use of the PAD Systems to permit hospitals and doctors to consider the products cost effective for patients requiring PAD treatment, or that current reimbursement levels for the PAD Systems will continue. In addition, the overall amount of reimbursement available for PAD treatment could decrease in the future. Failure by hospitals and other users of our products to obtain sufficient reimbursement could cause our business to suffer. 21 Table of Contents Medicare, Medicaid, health maintenance organizations and other third party payors are increasingly attempting to contain healthcare costs by limiting both coverage and the level of reimbursement, and, as a result, they may not cover or provide adequate payment for use of the PAD Systems. In order to position the PAD Systems for acceptance by third party payors, we may have to agree to lower prices than we might otherwise charge. Governmental and private sector payors have instituted initiatives to limit the growth of healthcare costs using, for example, price regulation or controls and competitive pricing programs. Some third party payors also require demonstrated superiority, on the basis of randomized clinical trials, or pre approval of coverage, for new or innovative devices or procedures before they will reimburse healthcare providers who use such devices or procedures. It is uncertain whether the PAD Systems or any future products we may develop will be viewed as sufficiently cost effective to warrant adequate coverage and reimbursement levels. If third party coverage and reimbursement for the PAD Systems is limited or not available, the acceptance of the PAD Systems and, consequently, our business will be substantially harmed. Healthcare reform legislation could adversely affect our operating results and financial condition. There have been and continue to be proposals by the federal government, state governments, regulators and third party payors to control healthcare costs and, more generally, to reform the U.S. healthcare system, some of which have been enacted into law, such as the Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act, or the Patient Act. Certain of these proposals and laws could limit the prices we are able to charge for our products or the amounts of reimbursement available for our products and could limit the acceptance and availability of our products. The Patient Act also imposes significant new taxes on medical device makers. The adoption of some or all of these proposals, including the recent federal legislation, could adversely affect our revenue and financial condition. We have limited data and experience regarding the safety and efficacy of the PAD Systems. Any long term data that is generated may not be positive or consistent with our limited short term data, which would affect market acceptance of these products. Because our technology is relatively new in the treatment of PAD, we have performed clinical trials only with limited patient populations. The long term effects of using the PAD Systems in a large number of patients are not known and the results of short term clinical use of the PAD Systems do not necessarily predict long term clinical benefit or reveal long term adverse effects. Clinical trials conducted with the PAD Systems have involved procedures performed by physicians who are very technically proficient. Consequently, both short and long term results reported in these studies may be significantly more favorable than typical results achieved by physicians, which could negatively impact market acceptance of the PAD Systems. We face significant competition, must innovate to stay competitive, and may be unable to sell the PAD Systems at profitable levels. The market for medical devices is highly competitive, dynamic and marked by rapid and substantial technological development and product innovations. Our ability to compete depends on our ability to innovate successfully, and while certain barriers exist to entry into our market we cannot assure that new entrants or existing competitors will not be able to develop products that compete directly with our products. We compete against very large and well known stent and balloon angioplasty device manufacturers, atherectomy catheter manufacturers, pharmaceutical companies, and companies that provide products used by surgeons in peripheral bypass procedures. We may have difficulty competing effectively with these competitors because of their well established positions in the marketplace, significant financial and human capital resources, established reputations and worldwide distribution channels. Our competitors may develop and patent processes or products earlier than we will; obtain regulatory clearances or approvals for competing medical device products more rapidly than we will; 22 Table of Contents market their products more effectively than we will; or develop more effective or less expensive products or technologies that render our technology or products obsolete or non competitive. We have encountered and expect to continue to encounter potential customers who, due to existing relationships with our competitors, are committed to or prefer the products offered by these competitors. If we are unable to compete successfully, our revenue will suffer. Increased competition might lead to price reductions and other concessions that might adversely affect our operating results. Competitive pressures may decrease the demand for our products and could adversely affect our financial results. We have limited commercial manufacturing experience and could experience difficulty in producing the PAD Systems or will need to depend on third parties to manufacture the products. We have limited experience in commercially manufacturing the PAD Systems and have no experience manufacturing these products in the volume that we anticipate will be required if we achieve planned levels of commercial sales. As a result, we may not be able to develop and implement efficient, low cost manufacturing capabilities and processes that will enable us to manufacture the PAD Systems or future products in significant volumes, while meeting the legal, regulatory, quality, price, durability, engineering, design and production standards required to market our products successfully. The forecasts of demand we use to determine order quantities and lead times for comp1nts purchased from outside suppliers may be incorrect. Failure to obtain required comp1nts or subassemblies when needed and at a reasonable cost would adversely affect our business. In addition, we may in the future need to depend upon third parties to manufacture the PAD Systems and future products. Any difficulties in locating and hiring third party manufacturers, or in the ability of third party manufacturers to supply quantities of our products at the times and in the quantities we need, could have a material adverse effect on our business. We depend upon third party suppliers, including single source suppliers to us and our customers, making us vulnerable to supply problems and price fluctuations. We rely on third party suppliers to provide us with certain comp1nts of our products and to provide key comp1nts or supplies to our customers for use with our products. We rely on single source suppliers for certain comp1nts of the PAD Systems. We depend on our suppliers to provide us and our customers with materials in a timely manner that meet our and their quality, quantity and cost requirements. These suppliers may encounter problems during manufacturing for a variety of reasons, any of which could delay or impede their ability to meet our demand and our customers demands. Any supply interruption from our suppliers or failure to obtain additional suppliers for any of the comp1nts used in our products would limit our ability to manufacture our products and could have a material adverse effect on our business, financial condition and results of operations. We may need to increase the size of our organization and we may experience difficulties managing growth. If we are unable to manage the anticipated growth of our business, our future revenue and operating results may be adversely affected. The growth we may experience in the future may provide challenges to our organization, requiring us to rapidly expand our sales and marketing personnel and manufacturing operations. Rapid expansion in personnel may result in less experienced people producing and selling our products, which could result in unanticipated costs and disruptions to our operations. If we cannot scale and manage our business appropriately, our anticipated growth may be impaired and our financial results will suffer. We may require additional financing, and our failure to obtain additional financing when needed could force us to delay, reduce or eliminate our product development programs or commercialization efforts. We may be dependent on additional financing to execute our business plan. Additional funds may not be available when we need them on terms that are acceptable to us, or at all. If adequate funds are not available on a 23 Table of Contents timely basis, we may terminate or delay the development of 1 or more of our products, or delay establishment of sales and marketing capabilities or other activities necessary to commercialize our products. In the event we need or desire additional financing, we may be unable to obtain it by borrowing m1y in the credit markets or raising m1y in the capital markets. We face a risk of non compliance with the financial covenants in our loan and security agreements with Silicon Valley Bank and Partners for Growth. We are party to loan and security agreements with Silicon Valley Bank and Partners for Growth. These agreements require us to maintain, among other things, a monthly specified liquidity ratio and a monthly adjusted earnings before interest, taxes, depreciation and amortization, or EBITDA, level. The agreements contain customary events of default, including, among others, the failure to comply with certain covenants or other agreements. Upon the occurrence and during the continuation of an event of default, amounts due under the agreements may be accelerated by Silicon Valley Bank or Partners for Growth. If we are unable to meet the financial or other covenants under the current loan and security agreements or negotiate future waivers or amendments of such covenants, events of default could occur under the agreements. Upon the occurrence and during the continuance of an event of default under the agreements, Silicon Valley Bank and Partners for Growth have available a range of remedies customary in these circumstances, including declaring all outstanding debt, together with accrued and unpaid interest thereon, to be due and payable, foreclosing on the assets securing the agreements and or ceasing to provide additional loans, which could have a material adverse effect on us. The restrictive covenants under these agreements could limit our ability to obtain future financing, withstand a future downturn in our business or the economy in general or otherwise conduct necessary corporate activities. The financial and restrictive covenants contained in the agreements could also adversely affect our ability to respond to changing economic and business conditions and place us at a competitive disadvantage relative to other companies that may be subject to fewer restrictions. Transactions that we may view as important opportunities, such as acquisitions, may be subject to the consent of Silicon Valley Bank and Partners for Growth, which consents may be withheld or granted subject to conditions specified at the time that may affect the attractiveness or viability of the transaction. We are dependent on our senior management team and highly skilled personnel, and our business could be harmed if we are unable to attract and retain personnel necessary for our success. We are highly dependent on our senior management. Our success will depend on our ability to retain senior management and to attract and retain qualified personnel in the future, including scientists, clinicians, engineers and other highly skilled personnel and to integrate current and additional personnel in all departments. The loss of members of our senior management, scientists, clinical and regulatory specialists, engineers and sales personnel could prevent us from achieving our objectives of continuing to grow the Company. We do not carry key person life insurance on any of our employees. Our stock price is volatile and subject to significant fluctuations. The market price of our common stock could be subject to significant fluctuations. Market prices for securities of early stage pharmaceutical, medical device, biotechnology and other life sciences companies have historically been particularly volatile. Our common stock traded as low as $7.26 and as high as $16.25 per share during the 12 month period ended June 30, 2012 Factors that may cause the market price of our common stock to fluctuate include, but are not limited to announcements of technological or medical innovations for the treatment of vascular disease; quarterly variations in our or our competitors results of operations; failure to meet estimates or recommendations by securities analysts who cover our stock; accusations that we have violated a law or regulation; sales of large blocks of our common stock, including sales by our executive officers, directors and significant stockholders; 24 Table of Contents changes in accounting principles; and general market conditions and other factors, including factors unrelated to our operating performance or the operating performance of our competitors. Moreover, the stock markets in general have experienced substantial volatility that has often been unrelated to the operating performance of individual companies. These broad market fluctuations may also adversely affect the trading price of our common stock. Risks Related to Government Regulation Our ability to market the PAD Systems in the United States is limited to use as a therapy in patients with PAD, and if we want to expand our marketing claims, we will need to file for additional FDA clearances or approvals and conduct further clinical trials, which would be expensive and time consuming and may not be successful. The PAD Systems received FDA 510(k) clearances in the United States for use as a therapy in patients with PAD. This general clearance restricts our ability to market or advertise the PAD Systems beyond this use and could affect our growth. If we determine to market our orbital technology in the United States for other uses, for instance, use in the coronary arteries, we would need to conduct further clinical trials and obtain premarket approval from the FDA. Clinical trials are complex, expensive, time consuming, uncertain and subject to substantial and unanticipated delays. Any delays in receiving, or failure to receive, FDA approval for a coronary application for the Diamondback 360 would delay or prevent us from accessing a substantial market segment and would have a substantial adverse effect on our potential future revenue. The PAD Systems may in the future be subject to product recalls that could harm our reputation and product liability claims that could exceed the limits of available insurance coverage. The FDA and similar governmental authorities in other countries have the authority to require the recall of commercialized products in the event of material regulatory deficiencies or defects in design or manufacture. Any recalls of our products or products that we distribute would divert managerial and financial resources, harm our reputation with customers and have an adverse effect on our financial condition and results of operations. Also, if the PAD Systems are defectively designed, manufactured or labeled, contain defective comp1nts or are misused, we may become subject to costly litigation by our customers or their patients. The use, misuse or off label use of the PAD Systems may result in injuries that lead to product liability suits, which could be costly to our business. We cannot prevent a physician from using the PAD Systems for off label applications. While we have product liability insurance coverage for our products and intend to maintain such insurance coverage in the future, there can be no assurance that we will be adequately protected from the claims that will be brought against us. We are subject to many laws and governmental regulations and any adverse regulatory action may materially adversely affect our financial condition and business operations. The PAD Systems and related manufacturing processes, clinical data, adverse events, recalls or corrections and promotional activities are subject to extensive regulation by the FDA and other regulatory bodies. In particular, we are required to comply with the FDA Quality System Regulation, or QSR, and other regulations, which cover the methods and documentation of the design, testing, production, control, quality assurance, labeling, packaging, storage and shipping of any product for which we obtain marketing clearance or approval. We are also responsible for the quality of comp1nts received by our suppliers. Failure to comply with the QSR requirements or other statutes and regulations administered by the FDA and other regulatory bodies, or failure to adequately respond to any observations, could result in, among other things warning or other letters from the FDA; 25 Table of Contents fines, injunctions and civil penalties; product recall or seizure; unanticipated expenditures; delays in clearing or approving or refusal to clear or approve products; withdrawal or suspension of approval or clearance by the FDA or other regulatory bodies; orders for physician notification or device repair, replacement or refund; operating restrictions, partial suspension or total shutdown of production or clinical trials; and criminal prosecution. If any of these actions were to occur, it would harm our reputation and cause our product sales to suffer. Our operations are also subject to regulatory requirements relating to the environment, waste management and health and safety matters, including measures relating to the release, use, storage, treatment, transportation, discharge, disposal and remediation of hazardous substances. Environmental laws and regulations could become more stringent over time, imposing greater compliance costs and increasing risks and penalties associated with violations. In addition, our relationships with physicians, hospitals and the marketers of our products are subject to scrutiny under various federal anti kickback, self referral, false claims and similar laws, often referred to collectively as healthcare fraud and abuse laws. If our operations are found to be in violation of these laws, we, as well as our employees, may be subject to penalties, including m1tary fines, civil and criminal penalties, exclusion from federal and state healthcare programs, including Medicare, Medicaid, Veterans Administration health programs, workers compensation programs and TRICARE (the healthcare system administered by or on behalf of the U.S. Department of Defense for uniformed services beneficiaries, including active duty and their dependents, retirees and their dependents), and forfeiture of amounts collected in violation of such prohibitions, which could materially adversely affect our financial condition and business operations. Risks Relating to Our Intellectual Property Our inability to adequately protect our intellectual property could allow our competitors and others to produce products based on our technology, which could substantially impair our ability to compete. Our success and ability to compete depends, in part, upon our ability to maintain the proprietary nature of our technologies. We rely on a combination of patents, copyrights and trademarks, as well as trade secrets and nondisclosure agreements, to protect our intellectual property. Our issued patents and related intellectual property may not be adequate to protect us or permit us to gain or maintain a competitive advantage. Also, we cannot assure you that any of our pending patent applications will result in the issuance of patents to us. Further, if any patents we obtain or license are deemed invalid and unenforceable, or have their scope narrowed, it could impact our ability to commercialize or license our technology. Changes in either the patent laws or in interpretations of patent laws in the United States and other countries may diminish the value of our intellectual property. In addition, the laws of some foreign countries may not protect our intellectual property rights to the same extent as the laws of the United States, if at all. We may, in the future, need to assert claims of infringement against third parties to protect our intellectual property. The outcome of litigation to enforce our intellectual property rights in patents, copyrights, trade secrets or trademarks is highly unpredictable, could result in substantial costs and diversion of resources, and could have a material adverse effect on our financial condition, reputation and results of operations regardless of the final outcome of such litigation. Despite our efforts to safeguard our unpatented and unregistered intellectual property rights, we may not be successful in doing so or the steps taken by us in this regard may not be adequate to detect or deter 26 Table of Contents misappropriation of our technology or to prevent an unauthorized third party from copying or otherwise obtaining and using our products, technology or other information that we regard as proprietary. In addition, we may not have sufficient resources to litigate, enforce or defend our intellectual property rights. Additionally, third parties may be able to design around our patents. We also rely on trade secrets, technical know how and continuing innovation to develop and maintain our competitive position. In this regard, we seek to protect our proprietary information and other intellectual property by having a policy that our employees, consultants, contractors, outside scientific collaborators and other advisors execute non disclosure and assignment of invention agreements on commencement of their employment or engagement. We cannot provide any assurance that employees and third parties will abide by the confidentiality or assignment terms of these agreements, or that we will be effective in securing necessary assignments from these third parties. Claims of infringement or misappropriation of the intellectual property rights of others could prohibit us from commercializing products, require us to obtain licenses from third parties or require us to develop non infringing alternatives, and subject us to substantial m1tary damages and injunctive relief. The medical technology industry is characterized by extensive litigation and administrative proceedings over patent and other intellectual property rights. The likelihood that patent infringement or misappropriation claims may be brought against us increases as we achieve more visibility in the marketplace and introduce products to market. We are aware of numerous patents issued to third parties that relate to the manufacture and use of medical devices for interventional cardiology. The owners of each of these patents could assert that the manufacture, use or sale of our products infringes 1 or more claims of their patents. There could also be existing patents of which we are unaware that 1 or more aspects of our technology may inadvertently infringe. In some cases, litigation may be threatened or brought by a patent holding company or other adverse patent owner who has no relevant product revenues and against whom our patents may provide little or no deterrence. Any infringement or misappropriation claim could cause us to incur significant costs, place significant strain on our financial resources, divert management attention from our business and harm our reputation. If the relevant patents were upheld in litigation as valid and enforceable and we were found to infringe, we could be prohibited from commercializing any infringing products unless we could obtain licenses to use the technology covered by the patent or are able to design around the patent. We may be unable to obtain a license on terms acceptable to us, if at all, and we may not be able to redesign any infringing products to avoid infringement. Item 1B. Unresolved Staff Comments. Not applicable.
